Hawaii statutes.
[§468L-2.5] Denial of registration.
The director may deny the registration of any travel agency or charter tour
operator when a travel agency or charter tour operator, its directors,
officers, owners, members, managers, or general partners:

(1) Fails to meet the requirements for registration
as provided in this chapter;

(2) Fails to
satisfy a civil fine, penalty, or restitution order arising out of any
administrative or enforcement action brought by any governmental agency for
conduct involving fraud or dishonest dealing, or for any violation of any
state's travel agency or charter tour operator licensing laws or rules;

(3) Has a pending
criminal, administrative, or enforcement proceeding brought against it in any
jurisdiction for conduct involving fraud or dishonest dealing, or for any
violation of any state's travel agency or charter tour operator licensing laws
or rules;

(4) Has had an
order or judgment entered against it in the past ten years in any criminal,
administrative, or enforcement action for conduct involving fraud or dishonest
dealing, or for any violation of any state's travel agency or charter tour
operator licensing laws or rules;

(5) Fails to
establish and maintain a client trust account in accordance with this chapter;

(6) Makes any
false statement, representation, or certification in any document or record
required to be maintained under this chapter;

(7) Fails to
keep, maintain, and disclose upon request the books and records required to be
maintained under this chapter; or

(8) Violates this
chapter or any rule or order of the director. [L 2001, c 62, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next